src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-52ehitellemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ehite(l)lemä: # Verb (52) ehite(l)lemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ehitelemä+V+Inf/mA: ehitelemä
     ehitelemä+V+Inf: ehitelläq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: ehitelnüq
     ehitelemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: ehiteld

     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ehitele
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ehitelet
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ehiteles
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ehitelemiq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ehiteletiq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ehiteleseq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: ehitele
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ehiteli
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ehitelit
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ehiteli
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ehitelimiq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ehitelitiq
     ehitelemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ehiteliq

     ehitelemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ehiteldä
     ehitelemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ehiteldäs

     ehitelemä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: ehitelev

     ehitelemä+V+Jus: ehitelguq
